Washington statutes.
RCW 32.34.010

Conversion of domestic savings bank—Rights, powers, etc., of successor institution.

(1) A domestic savings bank formed or converted under this title may convert itself into a state or federal credit union or a federal mutual or stock savings bank, national bank or, within the meaning of *chapter 30.49 RCW, a resulting state bank. The conversion shall be effected, notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of law:

(a) In the case of the conversion of a mutual savings bank without capital stock to a state or federal credit union or a federal mutual savings bank, by the vote of two-thirds of the trustees at a regular or special meeting of the trustees called for such purpose;

(b) In the case of the conversion of a stock savings bank to a federal stock savings bank, national bank or, within the meaning of *chapter 30.49 RCW, a resulting state bank, by the vote of a majority of the stockholders present, in person or by proxy, at a regular or special meeting of the stockholders called for such purpose;

(c) In the case of the conversion of a savings bank to a federal credit union, federal savings bank, or national bank, in compliance with the procedure, if any, prescribed by the laws of the United States.

(2) Notice of the meeting, stating the purpose thereof, shall be given the director at least thirty days prior to the meeting. If the conversion is authorized by the trustees or stockholders at the meeting, the trustees or stockholders are authorized and shall effect such action, and the officers of the savings bank shall execute all proper conveyances, documents, and other papers necessary or proper thereunto. If conversion is authorized, a copy of the minutes of the meeting shall be filed forthwith with the director.

(3) Upon consummation of the conversion, the successor credit union, federal savings bank, national bank, or resulting state bank shall succeed to all right, title, and interest of the mutual or stock bank, respectively, in and to its assets and to its liabilities to the creditors of the savings bank. Upon the conversion, after the execution and delivery of all instruments of transfer, conveyance, and assignment, the domestic savings bank shall be deemed dissolved.

(4) Every federal savings bank, the home office of which is located in this state, and the savings accounts therein, have all the rights, powers, and privileges and are entitled to the same immunities and exemptions as pertain to savings banks organized under the laws of this state.

[ 1999 c 14 s 32; 1994 c 92 s 406; 1983 c 45 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.49 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.49 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.